Utah statutes.
73-15-8.   Cloud seeding in Utah to target area in adjoining state.
Cloud seeding in Utah to target an area in an adjoining state is prohibited
except upon full compliance of the laws of the target area state the same as
if the cloud-seeding operation took place in the target area state, as well as
the other provisions of this act.
